Tennessee, session 114, SB1815.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 39, Chapter 13, Part 2, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) A person commits the offense of coercive suicide who:
(1) Intentionally, in any manner, advises or encourages another person
to commit or attempt to commit suicide for the purpose of inciting, persuading, or
aiding the other person to commit or attempt to commit suicide within an
imminent period of time; and
(2) Knows that the other person has communicated an intent to commit
suicide.
(b)
(1) A person or entity commits the offense of coercive suicide if such
person or entity owns an artificial intelligence system and the artificial intelligence
system:
(A) Advises or encourages a person to commit or attempt to
commit suicide by inciting, persuading, or aiding the person to commit or
attempt to commit suicide within an imminent period of time;
(B) Such person has communicated an intent to commit suicide to
the artificial intelligence system; and
(C) The person or entity who owns such artificial intelligence
system knew or reasonably should have known that the artificial
SB1815
010357
- 1 -

intelligence system could take the action as described in subdivision
(b)(1)(A) and negligently permitted the artificial intelligence system to be
accessible to the person who committed or attempted to commit suicide.
(2) As used in this subsection (b):
(A) "Artificial intelligence":
(i) Means a machine-based system that:
(a) Can, for a given set of human-defined
objectives, make predictions, recommendations, or
decisions; influence real and virtual environments without
significant human oversight; or that can learn from
experience in an automated manner and improve such
performance when exposed to data sets; or
(b) Is developed in any context, including software
or physical hardware, and solves tasks requiring human-
like perception, cognition, planning, learning,
communication, or physical action; and
(ii) Includes generative artificial intelligence; and
(B) "Generative artificial intelligence" means an artificial
intelligence system that is capable of creating new content or data,
including text, images, audio, or video, when prompted by an individual.
(c) A violation of this section is a Class D felony.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to offenses committed on or after that date.
- 2 - 010357